Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Deputizing of local fire marshals as state officers, §

25-2-12.1

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 2 designated the existing Code sections of this chapter (§§

25-3-1

through

25-3-6

) as Article 1 of the chapter.

25-3-1.
General powers of fire departments.

Any fire department of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision and any chartered fire department shall have the authority to:

Protect life and property against fire, explosions, hazardous materials, or electrical hazards;

Detect and prevent arson;

Administer and enforce the laws of this state; the rules and regulations adopted by the departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and agencies of this state; and any ordinances, rules, regulations, or codes adopted by the county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state that are related to the prevention and suppression of fires, explosions, or injuries from hazardous materials and explosions and the protection of life and property from such hazards;

Conduct programs of public education in fire prevention and safety;

Conduct emergency medical services and rescue assistance, subject to Chapter 11 of Title 31 and subject to the approval of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision;

Control and regulate the flow of traffic in areas of existing emergencies, including rail, highway, water, and air traffic; and

Perform all such services of a fire department as may be provided by law or which necessarily appertain thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1395, § 1.

25-3-2.
Powers of fire departments in event of emergencies generally.

In the event of any fire, explosion, bomb threat, or similar emergency, the fire department in any county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall be authorized to:

Enter any property, building, structure, vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, railroad car, or other place for the purpose of fighting the fire, explosion, or similar hazardous conditions or searching for a bomb or enter any such place which is, in the opinion of the chief officer of the fire department or his designee, endangered by fire, explosion, bomb threat, or similar hazardous conditions;

Cut any wires, electrical or otherwise, or turn off any utility, as deemed necessary to preserve life or property;

Prevent the blocking of any public or private street, road or alley, way or driveway, or emergency lane during any such emergency and remove any vehicles or other obstructions necessary;

Confiscate supplies, chemicals, or equipment necessary for such emergency;

Make any necessary tests; and

Evacuate any building or area necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1395, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 18; Ga. L. 1989, p. 271, § 1.

Cross references.

Liability of members of fire departments for acts performed while fighting fires or for acts performed at scenes of emergencies, § 51-1-30.

25-3-3.
Provision of assistance during emergencies to federal agencies or officers and state, or political subdivisions.

Any fire department may provide assistance to any agency or officer of the United States government, of this state, or of any political subdivision or authority thereof as may be needed to respond to any emergency or disaster, including, but not limited to, floods, sabotage, civil disturbance, fire, earthquake, wind, storm, wave action, oil spill or other water contamination, epidemic, air contamination, blight, drought, infestation, explosion, riot, or energy emergency, as defined by Chapter 3 of Title 38, or to respond to hazardous materials as defined by Article 7 of Chapter 5 of Title 32.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1395, § 4.

25-3-4.
Authority of counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions to enact ordinances, regulations, or codes.

The governing body of each county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state shall have the power to enact such ordinances, regulations, or fire and life safety codes as may be necessary to carry out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1395, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 1.

25-3-5.
Operation of other fire departments within municipalities or counties.

Nothing within this article shall be construed so as to permit a county or other fire department to operate within the limits of a municipality except by written or oral contract with the municipality. Nothing within this article shall be construed so as to permit a municipal fire department to operate in the unincorporated area of a county except by written or oral contract with the county.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1395, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 1.

25-3-6.
Effect of article on powers and duties of other officials and departments.

This article shall not affect the duties, powers, or responsibilities of the Safety Fire Commissioner, the state fire marshal, the sheriff’s office, the Department of Public Safety, local law enforcement agencies, the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Natural Resources, the State Forestry Commission, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Defense, or the Department of Public Health.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1395, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1758, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 25/HB 942.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “the State Forestry Commission” for “the Georgia Forestry Commission” in this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).